Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB702.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 52CTELEMEDICINE PROHIBITED FOR MEDICATION SAFETYSec.52C01. Definitions.52C02. Prohibition.§ 52C01. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Health care facility." The term shall have the same meaning given to that term under 40 Pa.C.S. § 4802 (relating to definitions).12345678910111213141516171819 "Health care provider." A health care facility, medical equipment supplier or person who is licensed, certified or otherwise regulated to provide health care services under the laws of this Commonwealth or another state."Risk evaluation and mitigation strategy." The medication safety program administered by the United States Food and Drug Administration under 21 U.S.C. § 355-1 (relating to risk evaluation and mitigation strategies)."Telemedicine." The term shall have the same meaning given to that term under 40 Pa.C.S. § 4802. § 52C02. Prohibition.A health car e provider may not use telemedicine to prescribe a patient located in this Commonwealth a medication for which the United States Food and Drug Administration has issued a risk evaluation and mitigation strategy.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0702PN0719 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516